Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, subdivision 1m, is amended to read: Subd. 1m. deleted text begin Electricdeleted text end new text begin All-electricnew text end vehicle. new text begin (a) new text end In addition to the tax under subdivision 1a, a surcharge of deleted text begin $75deleted text end new text begin $150new text end is imposed for an all-electric vehicle, as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 1a. Notwithstanding subdivision 8, revenue from the fee imposed under this subdivision must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. new text begin (b) By July 15 of each fiscal year, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer from the general fund to the highway user tax distribution fund an amount equal to: new text end new text begin (1) $79; times new text end new text begin (2) the number of surcharges collected under paragraph (a) in the preceding fiscal year. new text end new text begin (c) If the gasoline excise tax imposed by section 296A.07, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (3), is increased or decreased, the surcharge under paragraph (a) and the amount under paragraph (b), clause (1), must be increased or decreased, respectively, by a corresponding percentage. The commissioner must collect the adjusted surcharge amount under this paragraph on vehicle registrations occurring on or after the effective date of the gasoline excise tax adjustment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1n. new text end new text begin Plug-in hybrid electric vehicle. new text end new text begin (a) In addition to the tax under subdivision 1a, a surcharge of $75 is imposed for a plug-in hybrid electric vehicle as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 54a. Notwithstanding subdivision 8, revenue from the fee imposed under this subdivision must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. new text end new text begin (b) By July 15 of each fiscal year, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer from the general fund to the highway user tax distribution fund an amount equal to: new text end new text begin (1) $39.50; times new text end new text begin (2) the number of surcharges collected under paragraph (a) in the preceding fiscal year. new text end new text begin (c) If the gasoline excise tax imposed by section 296A.07, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (3), is increased or decreased, the surcharge under paragraph (a) and the amount under paragraph (b), clause (1), must be increased or decreased, respectively, by a corresponding percentage. The commissioner must collect the adjusted surcharge amount under this paragraph on vehicle registrations occurring on or after the effective date of the gasoline excise tax adjustment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1o. new text end new text begin All-electric motorcycle. new text end new text begin (a) In addition to the tax under subdivision 1b, a surcharge of $30 is imposed for an all-electric motorcycle as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 1b. Notwithstanding subdivision 8, revenue from the fee imposed under this subdivision must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. new text end new text begin (b) By July 15 of each fiscal year, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer from the general fund to the highway user tax distribution fund an amount equal to: new text end new text begin (1) $16; times new text end new text begin (2) the number of surcharges collected under paragraph (a) in the preceding fiscal year. new text end new text begin (c) If the gasoline excise tax imposed by section 296A.07, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (3), is increased or decreased, the surcharge under paragraph (a) and the amount under paragraph (b), clause (1), must be increased or decreased, respectively, by a corresponding percentage. The commissioner must collect the adjusted surcharge amount under this paragraph on motorcycle registrations occurring on or after the effective date of the gasoline excise tax adjustment. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 168.013, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1p. new text end new text begin Plug-in hybrid electric motorcycle. new text end new text begin (a) In addition to the tax under subdivision 1b, a surcharge of $15 is imposed for a plug-in hybrid electric motorcycle as defined in section 169.011, subdivision 54c. Notwithstanding subdivision 8, revenue from the fee imposed under this subdivision must be deposited in the highway user tax distribution fund. new text end new text begin (b) By July 15 of each fiscal year, the commissioner of management and budget must transfer from the general fund to the highway user tax distribution fund an amount equal to: new text end new text begin (1) $8; times new text end new text begin (2) the number of surcharges collected under paragraph (a) in the preceding fiscal year. new text end new text begin (c) If the gasoline excise tax imposed by section 296A.07, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (3), is increased or decreased, the surcharge under paragraph (a) and the amount under paragraph (b), clause (1), must be increased or decreased, respectively, by a corresponding percentage. The commissioner must collect the adjusted surcharge amount under this paragraph on motorcycle registrations occurring on or after the effective date of the gasoline excise tax adjustment. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1b. new text end new text begin All-electric motorcycle. new text end new text begin (a) "All-electric motorcycle" means an electric motorcycle that is solely able to be powered by an electric motor drawing current from rechargeable storage batteries, fuel cells, or other portable sources of electrical current. new text end new text begin (b) All-electric motorcycle excludes a plug-in hybrid electric motorcycle. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 169.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 54c. new text end new text begin Plug-in hybrid electric motorcycle. new text end new text begin "Plug-in hybrid electric motorcycle" means an electric motorcycle that: new text end new text begin (1) contains an internal combustion engine and also allows power to be delivered to the drive wheels by a battery-powered electric motor; new text end new text begin (2) when connected to the electrical grid via an electrical outlet, is able to recharge its battery; and new text end new text begin (3) has the ability to travel at least 20 miles powered substantially by electricity. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes must renumber the subdivisions in Minnesota Statutes, section 169.011, so that the definitions appear in alphabetical order. The revisor must make necessary cross-reference changes in Minnesota Statutes consistent with the renumbering. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective August 1, 2025. new text end